Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.030

Application for license—Fee.

An application for license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the department reasonably requires, which may include affirmative evidence of ability to comply with rules and regulations as are lawfully prescribed hereunder. Each application for license or renewal of license shall be accompanied by a license fee as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be required of charitable or nonprofit or government-operated institutions.

[ 1987 c 75 s 4; 1982 c 201 s 5; 1951 c 168 s 4.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 75: See RCW 43.20B.900.